Washington statutes.
RCW 30A.22.160

Payment to trust and P.O.D. account beneficiaries.

Financial institutions may pay any funds remaining on deposit in an account to a trust or P.O.D. account beneficiary or beneficiaries when the financial institution has received proofs of death of all depositors to the account who pursuant to the terms of the contract of deposit were required to predecease the beneficiary. If there is more than one trust or P.O.D. account beneficiary, financial institutions shall not, unless the contract of deposit otherwise provides, pay to any one such beneficiary more than that amount which is obtained by dividing the total of the funds on deposit in the account by the number of trust or P.O.D. account beneficiaries.

[ 1981 c 192 s 16. Formerly RCW 30.22.160.]